Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-133, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 349, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 6-133), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-133. A. As used in this section:
1. “Provider” means an eligible entity that seeks or has
obtained approval of an alternative teacher preparation program
consistent with this section; and
2. “Program” means content provided by a provider that leads
toward licensure in a specific content area.
B. The State Board of Education shall identify providers to
implement new and innovative pathways toward teacher certification
on a pilot program basis. Providers seeking to participate in the

pilot innovative pathways program shall submit applications to the
State Board of Education.
C. A provider chosen by the State Board of Education to
participate in the pilot innovative pathways program shall offer a
program that:
1. Provides evidence and history of fiscal solvency, capacity,
operation, and program effectiveness;
2. Provides evidence of necessary infrastructure to provide
accurate, timely, and secure data for the purpose of admission,
teacher candidate monitoring, testing, and certification
recommendations;
3. Has policies and procedures in place ensuring the security
of teacher candidate records under applicable laws and regulations;
4. Has the instructional capacity within an existing novice
teacher support program, the ability to obtain the instructional
capacity, or has established a partnership with an accredited higher
education institution to provide adequate instruction in accordance
with this subsection;
5. Offers an instructional phase that provides intensive
preparation before the teacher candidates assume classroom
responsibilities;
6. Offers a research-based and results-oriented approach
focused on best teaching practices to increase student achievement
and growth measured against state academic standards;
7. Provides assessment, supervision, and evaluation of teacher
candidates to determine their specific needs throughout the program
and to support efforts to successfully complete the program;
8. Provides intensive and ongoing professional development
opportunities that accelerate a teacher candidate’s professional
growth, support student learning, and provide a workplace
orientation, professional staff development, and mentoring;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1432 Page 2

9. Offers peer review focused on standards of professional
practice and continuous professional growth; and
10. Provides a process to review a teacher candidate’s final
competency of required certification content standards that leads to
a potential candidate being recommended for teacher certification in
accordance with subsection F of this section.
D. The State Board of Education shall ensure that providers
approved to participate in the pilot innovative pathways program
allow teacher candidates to demonstrate pedagogy and content
standard proficiency in school-based programs and through other
nontraditional means. Nontraditional means may include, but not be
limited to, previous work experience, teacher experience, educator
evaluations, industry-recognized certifications, and other
essentially equivalent demonstrations.
E. If the State Board of Education determines that a provider
fails to meet or is deficient in any of the requirements of this
section, it may suspend or revoke the approval of the provider after
providing notification of the deficiencies and an opportunity to
remedy the deficiencies.
F. A teacher candidate that completes a program offered by an
approved provider shall be eligible for certification, provided he
or she meets the certification requirements set forth in Section 6-
187 of this title in the area of specialization for which
certification is sought and is recommended for certification by the
approved provider.
G. The State Board of Education shall issue a certificate to
teach to any person who meets the requirements set forth in this
section and who has on file with the Board a current Oklahoma
criminal history record check from the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation as well as a national criminal history record check as
defined in Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The
person applying for the certificate shall be responsible for the
cost of the criminal history record checks.
H. A provider shall submit a report to the State Department of
Education after one (1) year of operation showing the percentage of
teacher candidates who have completed the program and who have
ENR. S. B. NO. 1432 Page 3

successfully completed or who have failed the competency
examinations for certification and the provider’s efforts to help
candidates successfully pass the examinations. A provider shall
annually submit a report to the State Department of Education
outlining the success of the program.
I. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
J. The pilot program created in this section shall end no later
than July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1432 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 17th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1432 Page 5